Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 2

Nature of Partnership

61-1-201. Partnership as entity.

A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

A limited liability partnership continues to be the same entity that existed before the filing of an application under former § 61-1-143.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-202. Formation of partnership.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit forms a partnership, whether or not the persons intend to form a partnership.

An association formed under a statute other than this chapter, a predecessor statute, or a comparable statute of another jurisdiction is not a partnership under this chapter.

In determining whether a partnership is formed, the following rules apply:

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the co-owners share profits made by the use of the property.

The sharing of gross returns does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in property from which the returns are derived.

A person who receives a share of the profits of a business is presumed to be a partner in the business, unless the profits were received in payment:

Of a debt by installments or otherwise;

For services as an independent contractor or of wages or other compensation to an employee;

Of rent;

Of an annuity or other retirement or health benefit to a beneficiary, representative, or designee of a deceased or retired partner;

Of interest or other charge on a loan, even if the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business, including a direct or indirect present or future ownership of the collateral, or rights to income, proceeds, or increase in value derived from the collateral; or

For the sale of the goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Cross-References. Equity participations, title 47, ch. 24.

Limited partnerships, title 61, ch. 2, part 1.

Presumption of partnership, §§ 24-5-108, 24-5-109.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 412.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 5-7, 10.

Law Reviews.

Business Associations — 1956 Survey (F. Hodge O'Neal), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 934.

Business Associations — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Robert N. Covington), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 923.

Professional Associations in Tennessee, 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 437.

Some Whys and Wherefores in Drafting Shareholder Agreements (Robert L. McMurray), 23 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1987).

The Tennessee Corporation Act and Close Corporations for Profit (James S. Covington, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 183.

61-1-203. Partnership property.

Property transferred to or otherwise acquired by a partnership is property of the partnership and not of the partners individually.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-204. When property is partnership property.

Property is partnership property if acquired in the name of:

The partnership; or

One (1) or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person's capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership but without an indication of the name of the partnership.

Property is acquired in the name of the partnership by a transfer to:

The partnership in its name; or

One (1) or more partners in their capacity as partners in the partnership, if the name of the partnership is indicated in the instrument transferring title to the property.

Property is presumed to be partnership property if purchased with partnership assets, even if not acquired in the name of the partnership or of one (1) or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person's capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership.

Property acquired in the name of one (1) or more of the partners, without an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person's capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership and without use of partnership assets, is presumed to be separate property, even if used for partnership purposes.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Cross-References. Employees' lien on firm property, title 66, ch. 13.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 692.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 14, 16.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Corporation Act and Close Corporations for Profit (James S. Covington, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 183.